New Jersey, session 222, A4346.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person shall not serve as a coach of a youth sports team unless the person possesses a certificate issued by the Commissioner of Health pursuant to subsection b. of this section. b.    The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), setting forth certification requirements necessary to serve as a coach of a youth sports team, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, which shall include, but not be limited to, first aid training and instruction in the administration of cardiopulmonary resuscitation.  The commissioner shall provide for the issuance of a certificate to a person who possesses or acquires the training required pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.     For the purposes of this section, youth sports team means a sports team organized or performing pursuant to a nonprofit or similar charter or which is a member team in a league organized by or affiliated with a county or municipal recreation department, for which enrollment is limited to juveniles under the age of 18. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Health may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.